apertium-sme-smj.sme.lexc
LEXICON MASAI
 !heavy fin syll
 !gen = -a ill = -ii
 !parallel to NYSTØ
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:%>X7 R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:a%> K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp+Use/Sub:a%>X7 R ; !
 +N+SgGenCmp:%>X7 R ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:a%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:i%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:a%>s K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Ess:a%>n K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:a%>t K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:a%>jd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:a%>jd R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:a%>jd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:a%>jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:a%>jgujn K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%> PxC ; !
 +N+Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:%> PxC ; !
 +N+Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:%> PxC ; !
 +N+Sg+Ill+Use/Ped:a%>sa%> PxA ; !
 +N+Sg+Loc+Use/Ped:a%>st%> PxC ; !
 +N+Sg+Com+Use/Ped:a%>jn%> PxC ; !
 +N+Ess+Use/Ped:a%>n%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:a%>jd%> Px1C ; !
 +N+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:a%>jd%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:a%>jd%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:a%>jdas%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:a%>jn%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:a%>jd%> PxPlComC ; !
 +N:a%> DenominalNounsV ;
 +N:a%> DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
! +N:a%> DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not very plausible


LEXICON KULTUR !Recent loanwords on -vra with short cmp-form
 +N+SgNomCmp:r%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp+Use/Sub:v'ra%> R ;	!
 +N+Sg+Nom:v'ra%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:v'ra%> Px3V ; !
 +N:v'ra%> EssV ;
 +N:v'ra%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
! +N:v'ra%> GOAHTAI ; !ai-illativ only for iija-words
 +N:v'ra DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N:v'ra DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N:v'ra DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON KANTUR
 +N+SgNomCmp:ántor%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:ántur%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp+Use/Sub:antuv'ra%> R ; !
 +N+Sg+Nom:antuv'ra%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:antuv'ra%> Px3V ; !
 +N:antuv'ra%> EssV ;
 +N:antuv'ra%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
! +N:antuv'ra%> GOAHTAI ; !ai-illativ only for iija-words
 +N:antuv'ra DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N:antuv'ra DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N:antuv'ra DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON MASKIN !Recent loanwords on -iidna with short cmp-form
 +N+SgNomCmp:in%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:ijdna%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:ijdna%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:ijdna%> Px3V ; !
 +N:ijdna%> EssV ;
 +N:ijdna%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
! +N:ijdna%> GOAHTAI ; !ai-illativ only for iija-words
 +N:ijdna DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N:ijdna DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N:ijdna DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON TELEFON !Recent loanwords on -vdna with short cmp-form
 +N+SgNomCmp:n%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:vdna%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:vdna%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:vdna%> Px3V ; !
 +N:vdna%> EssV ;
 +N:vdna%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
! +N:vdna%> GOAHTAI ; !ai-illativ only for iija-words
 +N:vdna DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N:vdna DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N:vdna DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON SOSIAL !Recent loanwords on -ála with both short and long cmp-form
 +N+SgNomCmp+Use/Sub:%> R ; !
 +N+SgNomCmp:a%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:a%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:a%> Px3V ; !
 +N:a%> EssV ;
 +N:a%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
! +N:a%> GOAHTAI ; !ai-illativ only for iija-words
 +N:a DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N:a DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N:a DenominalNounsV ;

! Miscellaneous noun types
! - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON OLLUVUOHTA !Exceptional vuohta-Nouns
 +N: VUOHTAMORPH ; !^B^ vuohtamorph it is

LEXICON MAGASH
 +N+SgNomCmp:%>X7 R ;
 +N+Ess:%>in K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:%>ijddá%> Px1V ; !
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>ijd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:%>ijd R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:%>ijddás%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:%>ijnni%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:%>ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ; !


LEXICON EGEZHAGAT
 +N+SgNomCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:a%>X4 K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:a%>X4 Px1V ; !
 +N+Pl+Nom:a%>X4t K ;
 +N+Ess:a%>n K ;
 +N+Ess+Use/Ped:a%>n%> PxC ; !
 +N:a%>X5 EGEZHAHKII ;

LEXICON EGEZHAHKII
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:jd%> Px1C ; !
 +Pl+Gen:jd K ;
 +PlGenCmp:jd R ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:jd%> PxC ; !
 +Pl+Acc:jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:jd%> PxC ; !
 +Pl+Ill:jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:jdasa%> PxV ; !
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:jn%> PxC ; !
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Ped:jd%> PxPlComC ; !

LEXICON BUVSSAT  !Pl.
 +N+SgNomCmp:%>X7 R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp+Use/Sub:%>X7 # ; ! (juovla CD)
 +N+Ess:%>n K ;
! +N+Sg+Gen:a%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Gen:%> PxC ; !^P^
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1 ;
! +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;					!not very plausible
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:%>X5jd%> Px1C ; !
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:%>X5jd R ;
 +N+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:%>X5jd%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:%>X5jd%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:%>X5jdasa%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:%>X5jn%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:%>X5jd%> PxPlComC ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X6žin K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X6žat K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:»X6žijddá%> Px1V ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X6žijd K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+PlGenCmp:»X6žijd R ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X6žijd K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X6žijdda K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X6žijn K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X6žijgujn K ;
!+N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X6žijddi%> PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:»X6žijddi%> PxV ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:»X6žijddi%> PxV ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:»X6žijddás%> PxC ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:»X6žijnni%> PxV ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:»X6žijddi%> PxPlComV1 ; !

LEXICON BUVSSATLONG  !Pl.
 +N+SgNomCmp:%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp+Use/Sub:%>X7 # ; ! (juovla CD)
 +N+Ess:%>n K ;
! +N+Sg+Gen:a%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Gen:%> PxC ; !^P^
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1 ;
! +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;					!not very plausible
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:%>X5jd%> Px1C ; !
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:%>X5jd R ;
 +N+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:%>X5jd%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:%>X5jd%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:%>X5jdasa%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:%>X5jn%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:%>X5jd%> PxPlComC ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X6žin K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X6žat K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:»X6žijddá%> Px1V ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X6žijd K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+PlGenCmp:»X6žijd R ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X6žijd K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X6žijdda K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X6žijn K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X6žijgujn K ;
!+N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X6žijddi%> PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:»X6žijddi%> PxV ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:»X6žijddi%> PxV ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:»X6žijddás%> PxC ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:»X6žijnni%> PxV ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:»X6žijddi%> PxPlComV1 ; !
 
LEXICON MUODUT !Like BASSI, but plural only
 +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:%>X5jd%> Px1C ; !
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd9 K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:%>X5jd R ;
 +N+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:%>X5jd%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd9 K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:%>X5jd%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:%>X5jdasa%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:%>X5jn%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:%>X5jd%> PxPlComC ; !
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
! +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ; not very plausible
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X6žin K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X6žat K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:»X6žijddá%> Px1V ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X6žijd K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+PlGenCmp:»X6žijd R ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X6žijd K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X6žijdda K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X6žijn K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X6žijgujn K ;
! +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X6žijddi%> PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:»X6žijddi%> PxV ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:»X6žijddi%> PxV ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:»X6žijddás%> PxC ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:»X6žijnni%> PxV ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:»X6žijddi%> PxPlComV1 ; !

LEXICON NounRoot
alliterašuvdna:alliterašu TELEFON "alliteration N" ;
 are^ála+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:are^ál SOSIAL ; !
 armatuv0ra:armatu KULTUR ; !^LOAN
 audio#visu^ála:audio#visu^ál SOSIAL ; !^LOAN
autorisašuvdna:autorisašu TELEFON ;
 bargiid#kantuv0ra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG:bargiid9#k KANTUR ; !
 biras#gáhtten#eise#válddit+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:biras#gáhtten#eise#vál'di BUVSSAT ; !
 biras#gáhtten#kantuv0ra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG:biras#gáhtten#k KANTUR ; !
 boazo#guohtun#kommišuvdna+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG:boazo#guohtun#kommišu TELEFON ; !
 brille#futterála+Use/Sub:brille#futterál SOSIAL ; ! !^LOAN
 bunnjelemasat+CmpN/PlG:bunnjelemass EGEZHAGAT ; !
denotašuvdna:denotašu TELEFON ;
 diktatuv0ra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG:diktatu KULTUR ;  !
 diktatuv0ra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG:diktatu KULTUR ;  !
 dosentuv0ra:dosentu KULTUR ; !^LOAN
 duodje#basttat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:duodje#bas'ta BUVSSAT ; !
dutkan#materi^ála:dutkan#materi^ál SOSIAL ;
 ealáhus#kantuv0ra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG:ealáhus#k KANTUR ; !
 eanan#doallo#kantuvra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG:eanan#doallo#k KANTUR ; !
 eanan#vuovdin#kantuv0ra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG:eanan#vuovdin#k KANTUR ; !
eanan#vuovdin#resolušuvdna:eanan#vuovdin#resolušu TELEFON ;
 figuv0ra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:figu KULTUR ; !
 filbma#festivála+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:filbma#festivál SOSIAL ; !
 gákkes#muorat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:gákkes#muorra BUVSSAT ; !
 giehta#ruovddit+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:giehta#ruov'di BUVSSAT ; !
 gieldda#kántuv0ra+Use/Sub:gieldda#kántu KULTUR ; !
 giella#kantuvra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG:giella#k KANTUR ; !
 giella#kantuvra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG:giella#k KANTUR ; !
 gobeliidna:gobel MASKIN ; !^LOAN
 granáhta#minerála:granáhta#minerál SOSIAL ; !^LOAN
 hálddahus#kantuv0ra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG:hálddahus#k KANTUR ; !
 iđit#livat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:iđit#livva BUVSSAT ; !
im^plikašuvdna:im^plikašu TELEFON ;
infra#struktuv0ra:infra#struktu KULTUR ;
 kantuv0ra+Use/Sub:kantu KULTUR ; !
 karnevála:karnevál SOSIAL ; !^LOAN
 komišuvdna+Use/Sub:komišu TELEFON ; !
korrektuv0ra:korrektu KULTUR ;
 kránnjážat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:kránnjáž MAGASH ; !
 kránnjážagat+CmpN/PlG:kránnjážah'k EGEZHAGAT ; !
 krukkat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:krugga BUVSSAT ; !
kultuv0ra:kultu KULTUR ;
 litteratuv0ra:litteratu KULTUR ; !^LOAN
 loahppa#meanut+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:loahppa#meannu BUVSSAT ; !
loahppa#kon^klušuvdna:loahppa#kon^klušu TELEFON ;
mašiidna:maš MASKIN ;
materi^ála:materi^ál SOSIAL ;
 nomen^klatuv0ra:nomen^klatu KULTUR ; !^LOAN
 numerála:numerál SOSIAL ; !^LOAN
 oahpahus#kantuvra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG:oahpahus#k KANTUR ; !
 oahppo#organisašuvdna+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG:oahppo#organisašu TELEFON ; !
pedála:pedál SOSIAL ;
 pláhtta#skárrit+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:pláhtta#skárri¤ BUVSSAT ; !
profešuvdna:profešu TELEFON ;
 ránnážat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ránnáž MAGASH ; !
 ránnážagat+CmpN/PlG:ránnážah'k EGEZHAGAT ; !
 ránnjážat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ránnjáž MAGASH ; !
 ránnjážagat+CmpN/PlG:ránnjážah'k EGEZHAGAT ; !
resepšuvdna:resepšu TELEFON ;
 rihpat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:rihppa BUVSSAT ; !
 ruhta#kantuv0ra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG:ruhta#k KANTUR ; !
 rukkat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:rugga BUVSSAT ; !
 ruhta#kantuv0ra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG:ruhta#k KANTUR ; !
 sádden#golut+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:sádden#gollu BUVSSAT ; !
 sektuv0ra+Use/Sub:sektu KULTUR ; !
 semi-finála:semi-finál SOSIAL ; !^LOAN
silát:silá BUVSSATLONG "(pl.)" ;
 skuvla#kantuv0ra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG:skuvla#k KANTUR ; !
 spiležat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:spilež MAGASH ; !
 spiležagat+CmpN/PlG:spiležah'k EGEZHAGAT ; !
 stigát+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:stih'ká BUVSSATLONG ; !
 stoahkan#are^ála+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:stoahkan#are^ál SOSIAL ; !
sub^stitušuvdna:sub^stitušu TELEFON ;
 tekstuv0ra:tekstu KULTUR ; !^LOAN
 váráiduhttin#kantuv0ra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG:váráiduhttin#k KANTUR ; !
 viellja#beležat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:viellja#belež MAGASH ; !
 viellja#beležagat+CmpN/PlG:viellja#beležah'k EGEZHAGAT ; !
 vokal#kombinašuvdna+Use/Sub:vokal#kombinašu TELEFON ; !
 vuodjan#buvssat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:vuodjan#buk'sa BUVSSAT ; !
